District of Columbia statutes.
26-1152.01

Applicability.

This subchapter shall only apply to a covered loan as defined in § 26-1151.01(7)(A).

History

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 201, 49 DCR 2551

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 201 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).